Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.118

College credit program information—Notification to schools and parents.

(1) Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall notify senior high schools and any other public school that includes ninth grade of the names and contact information of public and private entities offering programs leading to college credit, including information about online advanced placement classes, if the superintendent has knowledge of such entities and if the cost of reporting these entities is minimal.

(2) Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, each senior high school and any other public school that includes ninth grade shall publish annually and deliver to each parent with children enrolled in ninth through twelfth grades, information concerning the entrance requirements and the availability of programs in the local area that lead to college credit, including classes such as advanced placement, running start, tech-prep, skill centers, college in the high school, and international baccalaureate programs. The information may be included with other information the school regularly mails to parents. In addition, each senior high school and any other public school that includes ninth grade shall enclose information of the names and contact information of other public or private entities offering such programs, including online advanced placement programs, to its ninth through twelfth grade students if the school has knowledge of such entities.

[ 2000 c 126 s 1.]